Florida, session 2026, SB1274.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 97 98 Section 1.âThe Department of Transportation shall increase 99 the minimum perception reaction time of all steady yellow 100 signals in this state by 0.4 seconds. 101 Section 2.âSection 207.001, Florida Statutes, is amended to 102 read: 103 207.001âShort title.âThis chapter shall be known as the 104 âFlorida Diesel Fuel and Motor Fuel Use Tax Act of 1981,â and 105 the taxes levied under this chapter shall be in addition to all 106 other taxes imposed by law. 107 Section 3.âSection 207.002, Florida Statutes, is reordered 108 and amended to read: 109 207.002âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 110 (1)(2)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Highway Safety 111 and Motor Vehicles. 112 (2)ââInternational Fuel Tax Agreementâ means the reciprocal 113 agreement among certain states of the United States, provinces 114 of Canada, and other member jurisdictions which provides for the 115 administration, collection, and enforcement of taxes on the 116 basis of fuel consumed or distance accrued, or both, in member 117 jurisdictions. 118 (3)ââDiesel fuelâ means any liquid product or gas product 119 or combination thereof, including, but not limited to, all forms 120 of fuel known or sold as diesel fuel, kerosene, butane gas, or 121 propane gas and all other forms of liquefied petroleum gases, 122 except those defined as âmotor fuel,â used to propel a motor 123 vehicle. 124 (4)ââInternational Registration Planâ means a registration 125 reciprocity agreement among states of the United States and 126 provinces of Canada providing for payment of license fees or 127 license taxes on the basis of fleet miles operated in various 128 jurisdictions. 129 (3)(5)ââInterstateâ means vehicle movement between or 130 through two or more member jurisdictions states. 131 (4)(6)ââIntrastateâ means vehicle movement from one point 132 within a member jurisdiction state to another point within the 133 same member jurisdiction state. 134 (5)ââMember jurisdictionâ means a member of the 135 International Fuel Tax Agreement. 136 (6)(7)ââMotor carrierâ means any person owning, 137 controlling, operating, or managing any motor vehicle used to 138 transport persons or property over any public highway. 139 (7)(8)ââMotor fuelâ means any fuel placed in the fuel 140 supply storage unit of a qualified motor vehicle, including an 141 alternative fuel such as pure methanol, ethanol, or other 142 alcohol; a blend of 85 percent or more alcohol with gasoline; 143 natural gas and liquid fuel produced from natural gas; propane; 144 coal-derived liquified fuel; hydrogen; electricity; pure 145 biodiesel (B100) fuel, other than alcohol, derived from 146 biological materials; P-series fuel; or any other type of fuel 147 or energy used to propel a qualified motor vehicle what is 148 commonly known and sold as gasoline and fuels containing a 149 mixture of gasoline and other products. 150 (8)(9)ââOperate,â âoperated,â âoperation,â or âoperatingâ 151 means and includes the use utilization in any form of any 152 qualified commercial motor vehicle, whether loaded or empty, 153 whether used utilized for compensation or not for compensation, 154 and whether owned by or leased to the motor carrier who uses it 155 or causes it to be used. 156 (9)(10)ââPersonâ means and includes natural persons, 157 corporations, copartnerships, firms, companies, agencies, or 158 associations, singular or plural. 159 (10)(11)ââPublic highwayâ means any public street, road, or 160 highway in this state. 161 (11)(1)ââQualified commercial motor vehicleâ means any 162 vehicle not owned or operated by a governmental entity which 163 uses diesel fuel or motor fuel on the public highways; and which 164 has two axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross 165 vehicle weight in excess of 26,000 pounds, or has three or more 166 axles regardless of weight, or is used in combination when the 167 weight of such combination exceeds 26,000 pounds gross vehicle 168 weight or registered gross vehicle weight. The term excludes any 169 recreational vehicle or vehicle owned or operated by a community 170 transportation coordinator as defined in s. 427.011 or by a 171 private operator that provides public transit services under 172 contract with such a provider. 173 (12)ââRegistrantâ means a person in whose name or names a 174 vehicle is properly registered. 175 (12)(13)ââUse,â âuses,â or âusedâ means the consumption of 176 diesel fuel or motor fuel in a qualified commercial motor 177 vehicle for the propulsion thereof. 178 Section 4.âSection 207.004, Florida Statutes, is amended to 179 read: 180 207.004âLicensing registration of motor carriers; fuel tax 181 decals identifying devices; fees; renewals; temporary fuel-use 182 permits and driveaway permits.â 183 (1)(a)âA no motor carrier may not shall operate or cause to 184 be operated in this state any qualified commercial motor 185 vehicle, other than a Florida-based qualified commercial motor 186 vehicle that travels Florida intrastate mileage only, which that 187 uses diesel fuel or motor fuel until such carrier is licensed 188 has registered with the department or has registered under the 189 International Fuel Tax Agreement a cooperative reciprocal 190 agreement as described in s. 207.0281, after such time as this 191 state enters into such agreement, and has been issued fuel tax 192 decals an identifying device or such carrier has been issued a 193 temporary fuel-use permit as authorized under subsection 194 subsections (4) and (5) for each vehicle operated. The fee for 195 each set of fuel tax decals is There shall be a fee of $4 per 196 year or any fraction thereof. A copy of the license must be 197 carried in each vehicle or made available electronically. The 198 fuel tax decal for each such identifying device issued. The 199 identifying device shall be provided by the department and must 200 be conspicuously displayed on the qualified commercial motor 201 vehicle as prescribed by the instructions on the reverse side of 202 the decal department while the vehicle it is being operated on 203 the public highways of this state. The transfer of a fuel tax 204 decal an identifying device from one vehicle to another vehicle 205 or from one motor carrier to another motor carrier is 206 prohibited. The department or its authorized agent shall issue 207 the licenses and fuel tax decals. 208 (b)âThe motor carrier to whom fuel tax decals have an 209 identifying device has been issued is shall be solely 210 responsible for the proper use of the fuel tax decals 211 identifying device by its employees, consignees, or lessees. 212 (2)âFuel tax decals Identifying devices shall be issued 213 each year for the period January 1 through December 31, or any 214 portion thereof, if tax returns and tax payments, when 215 applicable, have been submitted to the department for all prior 216 reporting periods. Fuel tax decals Identifying devices may be 217 displayed for the next succeeding indicia period beginning 218 December 1 of each year. Beginning October 1, 2026, except as 219 otherwise authorized by the department, all fuel tax decal 220 renewal orders must be submitted electronically through an 221 online system prescribed by the department. 222 (3)âIf a motor carrier licensed in this state no longer 223 operates or causes to be operated in this state any qualified a 224 commercial motor vehicle, the fuel tax decal for each qualified 225 motor vehicle that is no longer operated or caused to be 226 operated by the motor carrier must identifying device shall be 227 destroyed and the motor carrier to whom the fuel tax decal 228 device was issued must shall notify the department immediately 229 by letter of such removal and of the number of the fuel tax 230 decal identifying device that was has been destroyed. 231 (4)âA motor carrier, before operating a qualified 232 commercial motor vehicle on the public highways of this state, 233 must require each qualified motor vehicle to display a fuel tax 234 decal an identifying device as required under subsections (1) 235 and (2) or must obtain a temporary fuel-use permit for that 236 vehicle as provided in subsection (5). A temporary fuel-use 237 permit shall expire within 10 days after date of issuance. The 238 cost of a temporary fuel-use permit is $45, and the permit 239 exempts the vehicle from the payment of the motor fuel or diesel 240 fuel tax imposed under this chapter during the term for which 241 the permit is valid. However, the vehicle is not exempt from 242 paying the fuel tax at the pump. 243 (5)(a)âA registered motor carrier holding a valid license 244 may certificate of registration may, upon payment of the $45 fee 245 per permit, secure from the department, or any wire service 246 authorized by the department, a temporary fuel-use permit. 247 (b)âThe fee for a temporary fuel-use permit is $45. A 248 temporary fuel-use permit expires 10 days after the date of 249 issuance and exempts the vehicle from payment of the motor fuel 250 tax imposed under this chapter during the period for which the 251 permit is valid. However, this paragraph does not exempt the 252 vehicle from payment at the pump of the fuel tax imposed under 253 chapter 206. 254 (c)âA blank temporary fuel-use permit, before its use, must 255 be executed by the motor carrier, in ink or type, so as to 256 identify the carrier, the vehicle to which the permit is 257 assigned, and the permitâs effective date and expiration date 258 that the vehicle is placed in and removed from service. The 259 temporary fuel-use permit shall also show a complete 260 identification of the vehicle on which the permit is to be used, 261 together with the name and address of the owner or lessee of the 262 vehicle. The endorsed temporary fuel-use permit must shall then 263 be carried on the vehicle that it identifies and must shall be 264 exhibited on demand to any authorized personnel. Temporary fuel 265 use permits may be transmitted to the motor carrier by 266 electronic means and shall be completed as outlined by 267 department personnel prior to transmittal. 268 (d)âThe motor carrier to whom a temporary fuel-use permit 269 is issued is shall be solely responsible for the proper use of 270 the permit by its employees, consignees, or lessees. Any 271 erasure, alteration, or unauthorized use of a temporary fuel-use 272 permit renders shall render it invalid and of no effect. A motor 273 carrier to whom a temporary fuel-use permit is issued may not 274 knowingly allow the permit to be used by any other person or 275 organization. 276 (b)âAn unregistered motor carrier may, upon payment of the 277 $45 fee, secure from any wire service authorized by the 278 department, by electronic means, a temporary fuel-use permit 279 that shall be valid for a period of 10 days. Such permit must 280 show the name and address of the unregistered motor carrier to 281 whom it is issued, the date the vehicle is placed in and removed 282 from service, a complete identification of the vehicle on which 283 the permit is to be used, and the name and address of the owner 284 or lessee of the vehicle. The temporary fuel-use permit shall 285 then be carried on the vehicle that it identifies and shall be 286 exhibited on demand to any authorized personnel. The 287 unregistered motor carrier to whom a temporary fuel-use permit 288 is issued shall be solely responsible for the proper use of the 289 permit by its employees, consignees, or lessees. Any erasure, 290 alteration, or unauthorized use of a temporary fuel-use permit 291 shall render it invalid and of no effect. The unregistered motor 292 carrier to whom a temporary fuel-use permit is issued may not 293 knowingly allow the permit to be used by any other person or 294 organization. 295 (c)âA registered motor carrier engaged in driveaway 296 transportation, in which the cargo is the vehicle itself and is 297 in transit to stock inventory and the ownership of the vehicle 298 is not vested in the motor carrier, may, upon payment of the $4 299 fee, secure from the department a driveaway permit. The 300 driveaway permits shall be issued for the period January 1 301 through December 31. An original permit must be in the 302 possession of the operator of each vehicle and shall be 303 exhibited on demand to any authorized personnel. Vehicle mileage 304 reports must be submitted by the motor carrier, and the road 305 privilege tax must be paid on all miles operated within this 306 state during the reporting period. All other provisions of this 307 chapter shall apply to the holder of a driveaway permit. 308 Section 5.âSection 207.005, Florida Statutes, is amended to 309 read: 310 207.005âReturns and payment of tax; delinquencies; 311 calculation of fuel used during operations in this the state; 312 credit; bond.â 313 (1)âThe taxes levied under this chapter are shall be due 314 and payable on the first day of the month following the last 315 month of the reporting period. The department may adopt 316 promulgate rules for requiring and establishing procedures for 317 annual, semiannual, or quarterly filing. The reporting period is 318 shall be the 12 months beginning January July 1 and ending 319 December 31 June 30. It shall be the duty of Each motor carrier 320 licensed registered or required to be licensed registered under 321 the provisions of this chapter must to submit a return by the 322 following due dates, except that if the last day of the month 323 falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the due date is 324 extended until the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or 325 legal holiday within 30 days after the due date. The due date 326 shall be as follows: 327 (a)âIf annual filing, the due date is January 31 shall be 328 July 1; 329 (b)âIf semiannual filing, the due dates are shall be 330 January 31 1 and July 31 1; or 331 (c)âIf quarterly filing, the due dates are shall be January 332 31 1, April 30 1, July 31 1, and October 31 1. 333 (2)âThe amount of fuel used in the propulsion of any 334 qualified commercial motor vehicle within this state may be 335 calculated, if the motor carrier maintains adequate records, by 336 applying total interstate vehicular consumption of all diesel 337 fuel and motor fuel used as related to total miles traveled and 338 applying such rate to total miles traveled within this state. In 339 the absence of adequate documentation by the motor carrier, the 340 department may adopt is authorized to promulgate rules 341 converting miles driven to gallons used. 342 (3)âFor the purpose of computing the carrierâs liability 343 for the fuel road privilege tax, the total gallons of fuel used 344 in the propulsion of any qualified commercial motor vehicle in 345 this state shall be multiplied by the rates provided in parts I 346 III of chapter 206. From the sum determined by this calculation, 347 there shall be allowed a credit equal to the amount of the tax 348 per gallon under parts I-III of chapter 206 for each gallon of 349 fuel purchased in this state during the reporting period when 350 the diesel fuel or motor fuel tax was paid at the time of 351 purchase. If the tax paid under parts I-III of chapter 206 352 exceeds the total tax due under this chapter, the excess may be 353 allowed as a credit against future tax payments, until the 354 credit is fully offset or until eight calendar quarters shall 355 have passed since the end of the calendar quarter in which the 356 credit accrued, whichever occurs first. A refund may be made for 357 this credit provided it exceeds $10. 358 (4)âThe department may adopt is authorized to promulgate 359 the necessary rules to provide for an adequate bond from each 360 motor carrier to ensure payment of taxes required under this 361 chapter. 362 (5)âBeginning October 1, 2026, except as otherwise 363 authorized by the department, all returns must be submitted 364 electronically through an online system prescribed by the 365 department. 366 Section 6.âSection 207.007, Florida Statutes, is amended to 367 read: 368 207.007âOffenses; penalties and interest.â 369 (1)âIf any motor carrier licensed registered under this 370 chapter fails to file a return or and pay any tax liability 371 under this chapter within the time required hereunder, the 372 department may impose a delinquency penalty of $50 or 10 percent 373 of the delinquent taxes due, whichever is greater, if the 374 failure is for not more than 30 days, with an additional 10 375 percent penalty for each additional 30 days, or fraction 376 thereof, during the time which the failure continues, not to 377 exceed a total penalty of 100 percent in the aggregate. However, 378 the penalty may not be less than $50. 379 (2)âIn addition to any other penalties, any delinquent tax 380 shall bear interest in accordance with the International Fuel 381 Tax Agreement at the rate of 1 percent per month, or fraction 382 thereof, calculated from the date the tax was due. If the 383 department enters into a cooperative reciprocal agreement under 384 the provisions of s. 207.0281, the department shall collect and 385 distribute all interest due to other jurisdictions at the same 386 rate as if such interest were due to the state. 387 (3)âAny person who: 388 (a)âWillfully refuses or neglects to make any statement, 389 report, or return required by the provisions of this chapter; 390 (b)âKnowingly makes, or assists any other person in making, 391 a false statement in a return or report or in connection with an 392 application for licensure registration under this chapter or in 393 connection with an audit; or 394 (c)âCounterfeits, alters, manufactures, or sells fuel tax 395 licenses, fuel tax decals, or temporary fuel-use permits without 396 first having obtained the departmentâs permission in writing; or 397 (d)(c)âViolates any provision of the provisions of this 398 chapter, a penalty for which is not otherwise provided, 399 400 commits is guilty of a felony of the third degree, punishable as 401 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. In addition, 402 the department may revoke or suspend the licensure and 403 registration privileges under ss. 207.004 and 320.02, 404 respectively, of the violator. Each day or part thereof during 405 which a person operates or causes to be operated a qualified 406 commercial motor vehicle without being the holder of fuel tax 407 decals an identifying device or having a valid temporary fuel 408 use or driveaway permit as required by this chapter constitutes 409 a separate offense within the meaning of this section. In 410 addition to the penalty imposed by this section, the defendant 411 is shall be required to pay all taxes, interest, and penalties 412 due to the state. 413 Section 7.âSubsection (1) of section 207.019, Florida 414 Statutes, is amended to read: 415 207.019âDiscontinuance or transfer of business; change of 416 address.â 417 (1)âWhenever a person ceases to engage in business as a 418 motor carrier within this the state by reason of the 419 discontinuance, sale, or transfer of the business of such 420 person, the person he or she shall notify the department in 421 writing at least 10 days before prior to the time the 422 discontinuance, sale, or transfer takes effect. Such notice must 423 shall give the date of discontinuance and, in the event of a 424 sale or transfer of the business, the date thereof and the name 425 and address of the purchaser or transferee. All diesel fuel or 426 motor fuel use taxes are shall become due and payable 427 concurrently with such discontinuance, sale, or transfer; and 428 any such person shall, concurrently with such discontinuance, 429 sale, or transfer, make a report and, pay all such taxes, 430 interest, and penalties; and the fuel tax decals must be 431 destroyed and the motor carrier to whom the decals were issued 432 must notify the department by letter of their destruction and of 433 the number of fuel tax decals that were destroyed, and surrender 434 to the department the registration issued to such person. 435 Section 8.âSubsection (5) of section 261.03, Florida 436 Statutes, is amended to read: 437 261.03âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 438 (5)ââOff-highway vehicleâ means any ATV, two-rider ATV, 439 ROV, or OHM, or other vehicle with motive power specifically 440 designed by the manufacturer that is used off the roads or 441 highways of this state and that is not registered and licensed 442 for highway use under chapter 320. 443 Section 9.âSection 261.11, Florida Statutes, is amended to 444 read: 445 261.11âPenalties.âNo off-highway vehicle may be operated 446 upon the public sidewalks, roads, streets, or highways of this 447 state, except as otherwise permitted by the managing local, 448 state, or federal agency. 449 (1)âA violation of this section is a noncriminal traffic 450 infraction, punishable as a moving violation as provided in 451 chapter 318. 452 (2)âA second or subsequent violation of this section is a 453 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 454 775.082 or s. 775.083. 455 Section 10.âSubsection (4) of section 311.10, Florida 456 Statutes, is transferred, renumbered as section 311.15, Florida 457 Statutes, and amended to read: 458 311.15 311.10âSeaports; cargo facilities; reporting 459 requirements Strategic Port Investment Initiative.â 460 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 461 (a)ââCargo purposesâ means any facility, activity, 462 property, energy source, or infrastructure asset that is not 463 intended to facilitate the transport of passengers and includes, 464 but is not limited to, such facilities, activities, properties, 465 energy sources, or infrastructure assets that support spaceport 466 activities. 467 (b)ââCommercial space launch industryâ means any company 468 substantially engaged in the transport, operation, and recovery 469 of space launch or landing services with active maritime 470 operations. 471 (2)âBeginning February 1, 2027, and each February 1 472 thereafter, each seaport located in a county in which real 473 property is designated as spaceport territory under s. 331.304 474 and which uses land, facilities, or infrastructure for the 475 purpose of supporting spacecraft launch and recovery operations 476 must submit a report to the chair of the Space Florida board of 477 directors which describes all measures the seaport has taken to 478 support the commercial space launch industry. The seaport must 479 post a copy of the report on its website once the report has 480 been submitted to the chair of the board. 481 (3)(4)âAs a condition of receiving a project grant under 482 any program established in this chapter and as a condition of 483 receiving state funds as described in s. 215.31, A seaport that 484 is located in a county in which real property is designated as 485 spaceport territory under s. 331.304 and that uses land, 486 facilities, or infrastructure for the purpose of supporting 487 spacecraft launch and recovery operations must, in any agreement 488 with the Department of Transportation, agree that the seaport 489 may not convert any planned or existing land, facility, or 490 infrastructure that supports cargo purposes to any alternative 491 purpose unless all of the following conditions are met: 492 (a)âThe governing board of the seaport must provide public 493 notice as provided in s. 50.011 at least 30 days before holding 494 a public meeting on the proposed conversion. 495 (b)âBefore approving the proposed conversion, the governing 496 board of the seaport must prepare or cause to be prepared a 497 report estimating the impact of the conversion on the cargo 498 operations of the seaport. The report must be prominently posted 499 on the seaportâs website at least 30 days before holding a 500 public meeting on the proposed conversion. 501 (c)âThe conversion must be is approved by a two-thirds vote 502 of by the seaportâs governing board of the seaport at a publicly 503 noticed meeting as a separate line on the agenda and with a 504 reasonable opportunity for public comment., and, if approved, 505 (4)âThe Legislature must expressly approve approves the use 506 of state funds for any a project that includes the such a 507 conversion of any planned or existing land, facility, or 508 infrastructure that supports cargo purposes to any alternative 509 purpose, whether by a work program amendment or through the 510 General Appropriations Act. As used in this subsection, the term 511 âcargo purposesâ includes, but is not limited to, any facility, 512 activity, property, energy source, or infrastructure asset that 513 supports spaceport activities. 514 Section 11.âSubsection (41) of section 316.003, Florida 515 Statutes, is amended to read: 516 316.003âDefinitions.âThe following words and phrases, when 517 used in this chapter, shall have the meanings respectively 518 ascribed to them in this section, except where the context 519 otherwise requires: 520 (41)âMICROMOBILITY DEVICE.âA motorized transportation 521 device designed for individual use which is typically 20 to 36 522 inches in width and 50 pounds or less in weight and which 523 operates at a speed of typically less than 15 miles per hour but 524 no more than 28 miles per hour. This term includes devices both 525 a human-powered and a nonhuman-powered device such as an a 526 bicycle, electric bicycle and a, motorized scooter, or any other 527 device that is owned by an individual or part of a shared fleet. 528 Section 12.âPresent subsections (3), (4), and (5) of 529 section 316.0777, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 530 subsections (4), (5), and (6), respectively, and a new 531 subsection (3) is added to that section, to read: 532 316.0777âAutomated license plate recognition systems; 533 installation within rights-of-way of State Highway System and on 534 and within property owned or controlled by private entity; 535 public records exemption.â 536 (3)âA private entity may install an automated license plate 537 recognition system solely for use on and within the property 538 owned or controlled by the entity and for a public safety 539 related purpose. A private entity that installs such a system: 540 (a)âMay not access vehicle registration data generated by 541 the system, except to the extent that such data cannot 542 reasonably be linked to an identified or identifiable 543 individual. 544 (b)âMay not share or sell images or data generated by the 545 system, except to the extent required to respond to a lawful 546 request from a law enforcement agency. 547 (c)âMust contractually obligate any third party that 548 installs, maintains, or operates the system to protect the 549 images or data generated by the system from disclosure, 550 including a prohibition on sharing or selling such images or 551 data, except to the extent required to respond to a lawful 552 request from a law enforcement agency. 553 (d)âMay not offer or provide as payment or other 554 consideration any portion of the proceeds derived from a fine or 555 charge imposed based on images or data generated by the system 556 to any third party that installs, maintains, or operates the 557 system. 558 Section 13.âSubsection (2) of section 316.20655, Florida 559 Statutes, is amended to read: 560 316.20655âElectric bicycle regulations.â 561 (2)âAn electric bicycle as defined in s. 316.003 or an 562 operator of an electric bicycle is not subject to the provisions 563 of law relating to financial responsibility, driver or motor 564 vehicle licenses, vehicle registration, title certificates, off 565 highway motorcycles, or off-highway vehicles. 566 Section 14.âSections 316.272 and 316.293, Florida Statutes, 567 are repealed. 568 Section 15.âPresent subsections (2) through (5) of section 569 316.3045, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (3) 570 through (6), respectively, and a new subsection (2) is added to 571 that section, to read: 572 316.3045âOperation of radios or other mechanical or 573 electronic soundmaking devices or instruments in vehicles; 574 exhaust systems; prevention of noise; exemptions.â 575 (2)âEvery motor vehicle shall at all times be equipped with 576 an exhaust system in good working order including muffler, 577 manifold pipe, and tailpiping to prevent excessive or unusual 578 noise. In no event shall an exhaust system allow noise at a 579 level plainly audible at a distance of 100 feet or more from the 580 motor vehicle. 581 Section 16.âSection 319.1401, Florida Statutes, is created 582 to read: 583 319.1401âTitling and registering golf carts converted to 584 low-speed vehicles.âA golf cart converted to a low-speed vehicle 585 may be titled and registered for operation on certain roads 586 without an inspection by the department. The owner of the low 587 speed vehicle shall affirm in writing that the vehicle complies 588 with the requirements of chapter 316 and shall be assigned an 589 identification number by the department. The identification 590 number shall be unique to the low-speed vehicle and used for the 591 issuance of a title and registration for the vehicle. 592 Section 17.âSection 322.032, Florida Statutes, is amended 593 to read: 594 322.032âDigital proof of driver license or identification 595 card; electronic credential autonomy and verification 596 integrity.â 597 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 598 (a)ââCredentialholderâ means a person who is issued a 599 digital proof of driver license or identification card. 600 (b)(a)ââDigital proof of driver licenseâ means an 601 electronic credential viewable on an electronic credentialing 602 system. 603 (c)(b)ââDigital proof of identification cardâ means an 604 electronic credential viewable on an electronic credentialing 605 system. 606 (d)(c)ââElectronic credentialing systemâ means a computer 607 system accessed using a computer, a cellular telephone, or any 608 other personal device which queries the departmentâs driver 609 license and identification card records, displays or transmits 610 digital proofs of driver licenses and identification cards, and 611 verifies the authenticity of those electronic credentials. 612 (e)ââFair information practice principlesâ means 613 internationally recognized privacy principles, including data 614 minimization, purpose specification, use limitation, 615 transparency, and strict data retention controls. 616 (f)(d)ââLimited profileâ means an electronic credential 617 containing some, but not all, of the information displayed on a 618 printed driver license or identification card. 619 (g)ââRecord integrityâ means the capability of ensuring 620 historical continuity and verifiability of electronic 621 credentials by maintaining a tamper-evident, append-only record 622 of digital driver license and identification card issuance, 623 renewal, replacement, or revocation. 624 (h)(e)ââScanningâ means obtaining data from a digital proof 625 of driver license or identification card in an electronic 626 format. 627 (2)(a)âThe department shall establish a secure and uniform 628 system for issuing an optional digital proof of driver license 629 or identification card. The department may contract with one or 630 more private entities to develop an electronic credentialing 631 system. 632 (b)âThe electronic credentialing system may not retain 633 Internet protocol addresses, geolocation data, or other 634 information that describes the location, computer, computer 635 system, or computer network from which a customer accesses the 636 system. 637 (c)âThe electronic credentialing system must: 638 1.âRequire the explicit consent of the credentialholder 639 before performing any communication. 640 2.âProvide offline cryptographic verification mechanisms 641 that: 642 a.âDo not require communication with the department. 643 b.âAre fully auditable and interoperable with open 644 standards. 645 c.âPreserve the anonymity and unlinkability of transactions 646 unless explicitly waived by the credentialholder. 647 3.âAdhere to fair information practice principles, 648 including collecting only the minimum data strictly necessary to 649 fulfill the stated purpose of verification. 650 4.âCollect data only for a single, clearly defined, and 651 limited purpose that is explicitly communicated to the 652 credentialholder. 653 5.âEnsure that data is not reused, repurposed, shared, or 654 transmitted beyond the initial purpose without the explicit 655 consent of the credentialholder. 656 6.âSecurely delete data or render data irreversibly 657 anonymized immediately upon fulfillment of the stated purpose 658 unless a longer retention period is required by law and narrowly 659 tailored to that legal necessity. 660 7.âImplement measures to ensure record integrity. The 661 electronic credentials must be verified based solely on the 662 record integrity and without relying on third parties. 663 8.âImplement verifiable receipt mechanisms that ensure any 664 changes made to electronic credentials are independently 665 confirmable and auditable by any relying party. 666 (d)âElectronic credential verifiers must: 667 1.âPerform full cryptographic validation of electronic 668 credential authenticity, integrity, and issuer attribution 669 without requiring online access to external systems, the 670 departmentâs systems, or any state system. 671 2.âRetain only temporary user-authorized verification data 672 that is strictly necessary for the transaction. 673 3.âCreate written strict data minimization principles that 674 must be provided to a credentialholder upon request. 675 4.âProvide a credentialholder with the ability to audit 676 verification requests and control the sharing of electronic 677 credential attributes. 678 (e)âElectronic credentials must: 679 1.âBe issued as tamper-evident, cryptographically 680 verifiable statements capable of being selectively disclosed. 681 2.âContain clear metadata specifying cryptographic material 682 necessary for independent verification. 683 3.âBe controlled by the credentialholder, who may choose to 684 disclose only the minimum information necessary for a 685 transaction. 686 4.âUse a cryptographically derived identifier format that: 687 a.âIs capable of secure key rotation, recovery, delegation, 688 and revocation without requiring a centralized registry or 689 continuous third-party oversight. 690 b.âRotates cryptographic keys without requiring reissuance 691 or reregistration with a central authority. 692 c.âIs resolvable to metadata that contains authentication 693 and authorization material without dependence on a single 694 service endpoint or central registry. 695 d.âImplements delegation, recovery, and secure binding to 696 cryptographic keys without requiring persistent correlatable 697 identifiers across contexts. 698 (3)(a)âThe digital proof of driver license or 699 identification card established by the department or by an 700 entity contracted by the department must be in such a format as 701 to allow verification of the authenticity of the digital proof 702 of driver license or identification card. The department may 703 adopt rules to ensure valid authentication of digital driver 704 licenses and identification cards. 705 (b)1.âNotwithstanding ss. 322.14-322.142, and any other law 706 prescribing the design for, or information required to be 707 displayed on, a driver license, a digital proof of driver 708 license may comprise a limited profile that includes only 709 information necessary to conduct a specific transaction on the 710 electronic credentialing system. 711 2.âNotwithstanding ss. 322.051 and 322.141, and any other 712 law prescribing the design for, or information required to be 713 displayed on, an identification card, a digital proof of 714 identification card may comprise a limited profile that includes 715 only information necessary to conduct a specific transaction on 716 the electronic credentialing system. 717 (4)âA person may not be issued a digital proof of driver 718 license or identification card until he or she satisfies all 719 requirements of this chapter for issuance of the respective 720 driver license or identification card and has been issued a 721 printed driver license or identification card. The electronic 722 credentialing system must, upon each presentation of a digital 723 driver license or identification card, display or transmit 724 current records for the driver license or identification card. 725 If a licenseeâs driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or 726 disqualified, or if his or her driver license is otherwise 727 canceled or expired, a digital proof of driver license may not 728 be issued; however, a digital proof of identification card may 729 be issued if the licensee is otherwise eligible for an 730 identification card under s. 322.051. 731 (5)âThe department may use a telephone number submitted by 732 a licensee or cardholder in connection with a digital driver 733 license or identification card only for purposes of 734 communication regarding the digital proof of driver license or 735 identification card or the motor vehicle records, as defined in 736 s. 119.0712(2)(a), of the licensee or cardholder. 737 (6)âThe department may enter into contracts with one or 738 more private entities which authorize online data calls or 739 offline data verification through the electronic credentialing 740 system that queries the departmentâs driver license and 741 identification card records, displays or transmits digital 742 proofs of driver licenses or identification cards, or verifies 743 the authenticity of such electronic credentials. 744 (7)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b), a private 745 entity that scans a digital proof of driver license or 746 identification card may not store, sell, or share personal 747 information collected from such scanning of the digital proof of 748 driver license or identification card unless: 749 1.âThe credentialholder has provided clear, informed, and 750 revocable consent. 751 2.âThe retention serves a legally justified, narrowly 752 tailored, and time-limited purpose. 753 (b)âA credentialholder An individual may consent to allow a 754 private entity to collect and store personal information 755 obtained by scanning his or her digital proof of driver license 756 or identification card. However, the credentialholder individual 757 must be informed what information is collected and the purpose 758 or purposes for which the information will be used. If the 759 credentialholder individual does not want the private entity to 760 scan his or her digital proof of the credentialholderâs 761 individualâs driver license or identification card, the private 762 entity may manually collect personal information from the 763 credentialholder individual. 764 (c)âA private entity that violates this subsection is 765 subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 per occurrence, 766 suspension of eligibility to participate in the electronic 767 credentialing system, and public disclosure of the private 768 entityâs noncompliance. 769 (d)âThis subsection does not apply to a financial 770 institution as defined in s. 655.005(1)(i). 771 (8)âCourts shall afford strict scrutiny to any unnecessary 772 government or commercial surveillance or remote verification 773 practices that do not comply with this section. 774 (9)(8)âA person who: 775 (a)âManufactures a false digital proof of driver license or 776 identification card commits a felony of the third degree, 777 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 778 (b)âPossesses a false digital proof of driver license or 779 identification card commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, 780 punishable as provided in s. 775.082. 781 Section 18.âParagraph (d) is added to subsection (11) of 782 section 337.11, Florida Statutes, to read: 783 337.11âContracting authority of department; bids; emergency 784 repairs, supplemental agreements, and change orders; combined 785 design and construction contracts; progress payments; records; 786 requirements of vehicle registration.â 787 (11) 788 (d)1.âThe department may make direct payments to first-tier 789 subcontractors if the following conditions are met: 790 a.âThe contractor has not requested payment from the 791 department for at least 6 months. 792 b.âThere is a binding, written subcontract between the 793 contractor and the subcontractor, and the department is in 794 possession of a complete copy of the subcontract. 795 c.âThe subcontractor has performed work that is unpaid by 796 the contractor, and the department has sufficient documentation 797 of such unpaid work. 798 d.âThere is no bona fide, documented dispute between the 799 contractor and the subcontractor. 800 2.âAny amounts paid by the department under this paragraph 801 shall be deducted from amounts otherwise due the contractor. 802 Section 19.âPresent subsection (6) of section 337.18, 803 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (7), and a new 804 subsection (6) is added to that section, to read: 805 337.18âSurety bonds for construction or maintenance 806 contracts; requirement with respect to contract award; bond 807 requirements; defaults; damage assessments.â 808 (6)âIf the department declares a default on the part of any 809 contractor for cause attributable to such contractor, and the 810 department engages the surety to perform pursuant to the terms 811 of the bond, the department and the surety must enter into a 812 takeover agreement requiring the suretyâs completion contractor 813 to meet the prequalification requirements of the original 814 contract bid solicitation and requiring the surety to follow the 815 contractâs procedures regarding the completion contractor 816 default and certification of disbursement of payment to 817 subcontractors. 818 Section 20.âSection 339.85, Florida Statutes, is amended to 819 read: 820 (Substantial rewording of section. See 821 s. 339.85, F.S., for present text.) 822 339.85âNext-generation Traffic Signal Modernization Grant 823 Program.â 824 (1)âThe Legislature finds that: 825 (a)âThis stateâs growing population and economic activity 826 place increasing demands on public roads, resulting in 827 congestion, delay, and avoidable crashes at signalized 828 intersections. 829 (b)âModern signal control systems that incorporate 830 artificial intelligence and machine learning (AI/ML) can 831 dynamically optimize timing plans in response to real-time 832 conditions, improving travel time reliability, reducing 833 secondary crashes, and lowering emissions from idling vehicles. 834 (c)âIntersections are often owned or operated by local 835 governments, yet the benefits of improved operations accrue to 836 the traveling public statewide; therefore, a coordinated state 837 local partnership is in the public interest. 838 (d)âLeveraging AI/ML for signal operations complements 839 existing investments in managed lanes, transit priority, 840 connected vehicle pilots, emergency preemption, and freight 841 corridors, and can be deployed at comparatively low cost and 842 high speed. 843 (e)âA voluntary, performance-based grant program with local 844 matching funds will accelerate deployment of signal 845 modernizations while protecting taxpayers through measurable 846 outcomes and transparent reporting. 847 (2)âThe department shall implement a Next-generation 848 Traffic Signal Modernization Grant Program. The purpose of the 849 program is to assist counties and municipalities in upgrading 850 eligible signalized intersections with AI/ML-enabled detection, 851 controllers, communications, and software that prioritizes 852 modernization in key corridors across this state. 853 (3)(a)âThe department shall implement a state-local 854 partnership through a cost-sharing arrangement as follows: 855 1.âAuthorize the department to fund first-year pilot 856 corridors at up to 80 percent of eligible costs, with a minimum 857 20 percent local contribution. 858 2.âAuthorize the department to fund 50 percent of ensuing 859 year research and development and installation. 860 (b)âOngoing maintenance after signal modernization shall be 861 the responsibility of the local government and the vendor. 862 (4)âThe department may waive any local match requirement 863 for state-owned or state-operated intersections. 864 (5)âThe department shall prioritize grant applications for 865 intersections at which a signal modernization will measurably: 866 (a)âReduce average control delay and corridor travel times. 867 (b)âImprove surrogate safety measures, such as failures to 868 stop at red lights and hard-braking events, and support 869 emergency vehicle preemption. 870 (c)âProvide transit signal priority and multimodal benefits 871 to pedestrians and cyclists. 872 (6)âThe department shall use competitive procurement as 873 provided in chapter 287 to find a vendor or vendors that use 874 state-of-the-art technology that complies with leading 875 cybersecurity standards, such as SOC 2 and ISO 27001, ensuring 876 robust data protection. The program shall also: 877 (a)âRequire open, interoperable, and secure systems that 878 avoid vendor lock-in and protect cybersecurity. 879 (b)âEnsure data transparency through standardized 880 performance dashboards and annual public reports demonstrating 881 benefits relative to cost. 882 (c)âCoordinate with metropolitan planning organizations, 883 regional traffic management centers, and law enforcement, fire 884 rescue, and transit agencies to maximize systemwide benefits. 885 (d)âEncourage use of state-based pilots, sandboxes, and 886 independent evaluations to validate performance before large 887 scale rollout. 888 (e)âSupport workforce development and local operations 889 staff training so upgrades remain effective over the life of the 890 equipment. 891 (7)âBeginning in fiscal year 2026-2027, $20 million is 892 appropriated annually from the State Transportation Trust Fund 893 to the department to fund the Next-generation Traffic Signal 894 Modernization Grant Program as described in this section. 895 Section 21.âSection 207.003, Florida Statutes, is amended 896 to read: 897 207.003âPrivilege tax levied.âA tax for the privilege of 898 operating any qualified commercial motor vehicle upon the public 899 highways of this state shall be levied upon every motor carrier 900 at a rate which includes the minimum rates provided in parts I 901 III of chapter 206 on each gallon of diesel fuel or motor fuel 902 used for the propulsion of a qualified commercial motor vehicle 903 by such motor carrier within this the state. 904 Section 22.âSection 207.008, Florida Statutes, is amended 905 to read: 906 207.008âRetention of records by motor carrier.âEach 907 licensed registered motor carrier shall maintain and keep 908 pertinent records and papers as may be required by the 909 department for the reasonable administration of this chapter and 910 shall preserve the records upon which each quarterly tax return 911 is based for 4 years after following the due date or filing date 912 of the return, whichever is later. 913 Section 23.âSubsection (3) of section 207.011, Florida 914 Statutes, is amended to read: 915 207.011âInspection of records; hearings; forms; rules.â 916 (3)âThe department, or any authorized agent thereof, may is 917 authorized to examine the records, books, papers, and equipment 918 of any motor carrier, any retail dealer of motor diesel fuels, 919 and any wholesale distributor of diesel fuels or motor fuels 920 which that are deemed necessary to verify the truth and accuracy 921 of any statement, or report, or return and ascertain whether the 922 tax imposed by this chapter has been paid. 923 Section 24.âSection 207.013, Florida Statutes, is amended 924 to read: 925 207.013âSuits for collection of unpaid taxes, penalties, 926 and interest.âUpon demand of the department, the Department of 927 Legal Affairs or the state attorney for a judicial circuit shall 928 bring appropriate actions, in the name of the state or in the 929 name of the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles in 930 the capacity of its office, for the recovery of taxes, 931 penalties, and interest due under this chapter; and judgment 932 shall be rendered for the amount so found to be due together 933 with costs. However, if it is shall be found as a fact that such 934 claim for, or grant of, an exemption or credit was willful on 935 the part of any motor carrier, retail dealer, or distributor of 936 diesel fuel or motor fuel, judgment must shall be rendered for 937 double the amount of the tax found to be due with costs. The 938 department may employ an attorney at law to institute and 939 prosecute proper proceedings to enforce payment of the taxes, 940 penalties, and interest provided for by this chapter and may fix 941 the compensation for the services of such attorney at law. 942 Section 25.âSubsection (3) of section 207.014, Florida 943 Statutes, is amended to read: 944 207.014âDepartmental warrant for collection of unpaid 945 taxes.â 946 (3)âIn the event there is a contest or claim of any kind 947 with reference to the property levied upon or the amount of 948 taxes, costs, or penalties due, such contest or claim must shall 949 be tried in the circuit court in and for the county in which the 950 warrant was executed, as nearly as may be in the same manner and 951 means as such contest or claim would have been tried in such 952 court had the warrant originally issued upon a judgment rendered 953 by such court. The warrant issued as provided in this section 954 constitutes shall constitute prima facie evidence of the amount 955 of taxes, interest, and penalties due to the state by the motor 956 carrier,; and the burden of proof is shall be upon the motor 957 carrier, retail dealer, or distributor of diesel fuel or motor 958 fuel to show that the amounts or penalties were incorrect. 959 Section 26.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 207.023, 960 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 961 207.023âAuthority to inspect vehicles, make arrests, seize 962 property, and execute warrants.â 963 (1)âAs a part of their responsibility when inspecting 964 qualified motor commercial vehicles, the Department of Highway 965 Safety and Motor Vehicles, the Department of Agriculture and 966 Consumer Services, and the Department of Transportation shall 967 ensure that all vehicles are properly qualified under the 968 provisions of this chapter. 969 (3)âQualified commercial motor vehicles owned or operated 970 by any motor carrier who refuses to comply with this chapter may 971 be seized by authorized agents or employees of the Department of 972 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, the Department of Agriculture 973 and Consumer Services, or the Department of Transportation; or 974 authorized agents and employees of any of these departments also 975 may seize property as set out in ss. 206.205, 206.21, and 976 206.215. Upon such seizure, the property must shall be 977 surrendered without delay to the sheriff of the county where the 978 property was seized for further proceedings. 979 Section 27.âSubsections (1) and (6) of section 207.0281, 980 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 981 207.0281âRegistration; Cooperative reciprocal agreements 982 between states.â 983 (1)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles may 984 enter into a cooperative reciprocal agreement, including, but 985 not limited to, the International Fuel Tax fuel-tax Agreement, 986 with another state or group of states for the administration of 987 the tax imposed by this chapter. An agreement arrangement, 988 declaration, or amendment is not effective until stated in 989 writing and filed with the Department of Highway Safety and 990 Motor Vehicles. 991 (6)âThis section and the contents of any reciprocal 992 agreement entered into under this section supersede all other 993 fuel-tax requirements of this chapter for qualified commercial 994 motor vehicles. 995 Section 28.âParagraph (aa) of subsection (7) of section 996 212.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 997 212.08âSales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and 998 storage tax; specified exemptions.âThe sale at retail, the 999 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the 1000 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following 1001 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this 1002 chapter. 1003 (7)âMISCELLANEOUS EXEMPTIONS.âExemptions provided to any 1004 entity by this chapter do not inure to any transaction that is 1005 otherwise taxable under this chapter when payment is made by a 1006 representative or employee of the entity by any means, 1007 including, but not limited to, cash, check, or credit card, even 1008 when that representative or employee is subsequently reimbursed 1009 by the entity. In addition, exemptions provided to any entity by 1010 this subsection do not inure to any transaction that is 1011 otherwise taxable under this chapter unless the entity has 1012 obtained a sales tax exemption certificate from the department 1013 or the entity obtains or provides other documentation as 1014 required by the department. Eligible purchases or leases made 1015 with such a certificate must be in strict compliance with this 1016 subsection and departmental rules, and any person who makes an 1017 exempt purchase with a certificate that is not in strict 1018 compliance with this subsection and the rules is liable for and 1019 shall pay the tax. The department may adopt rules to administer 1020 this subsection. 1021 (aa)âQualified motor certain commercial vehicles.âAlso 1022 exempt is the sale, lease, or rental of a qualified commercial 1023 motor vehicle as defined in s. 207.002, when the following 1024 conditions are met: 1025 1.âThe sale, lease, or rental occurs between two commonly 1026 owned and controlled corporations; 1027 2.âSuch vehicle was titled and registered in this state at 1028 the time of the sale, lease, or rental; and 1029 3.âFlorida sales tax was paid on the acquisition of such 1030 vehicle by the seller, lessor, or renter. 1031 Section 29.âSubsection (6) of section 316.455, Florida 1032 Statutes, is amended to read: 1033 316.455âOther equipment.âEvery motorcycle and every motor 1034 driven cycle when operated upon a highway shall comply with the 1035 requirements and limitations of: 1036 (6)âSection 316.272 on the requirement for mufflers and 1037 prevention of noise. 1038 1039 A violation of this section is a noncriminal traffic infraction, 1040 punishable as a nonmoving violation as provided in chapter 318. 1041 Section 30.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (4) of 1042 section 316.545, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1043 316.545âWeight and load unlawful; special fuel and motor 1044 fuel tax enforcement; inspection; penalty; review.â 1045 (4)(a)âA commercial vehicle may not be operated over the 1046 highways of this state unless it has been properly licensed 1047 registered under s. 207.004. Whenever any law enforcement 1048 officer identified in s. 207.023(1), upon inspecting the vehicle 1049 or combination of vehicles, determines that the vehicle is in 1050 violation of s. 207.004, a penalty in the amount of $50 shall be 1051 assessed, and the vehicle may be detained until payment is 1052 collected by the law enforcement officer. 1053 (b)âIn addition to the penalty provided for in paragraph 1054 (a), the vehicle may be detained until the owner or operator of 1055 the vehicle furnishes evidence that the vehicle has been 1056 properly licensed registered pursuant to s. 207.004. Any officer 1057 of the Florida Highway Patrol or agent of the Department of 1058 Transportation may issue a temporary fuel-use fuel use permit 1059 and collect the appropriate fee as provided for in s. 207.004(5) 1060 s. 207.004(4). Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (6), 1061 all permit fees collected pursuant to this paragraph shall be 1062 transferred to the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 1063 Vehicles to be allocated pursuant to s. 207.026. 1064 Section 31.âSubsection (24) of section 318.18, Florida 1065 Statutes, is amended to read: 1066 318.18âAmount of penalties.âThe penalties required for a 1067 noncriminal disposition pursuant to s. 318.14 or a criminal 1068 offense listed in s. 318.17 are as follows: 1069 (24)âIn addition to any penalties imposed, a fine of $200 1070 for a first offense and a fine of $500 for a second or 1071 subsequent offense for a violation of s. 316.293(5). 1072 Section 32.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 1073 324.171, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1074 324.171âSelf-insurer.â 1075 (1)âAny person may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a 1076 certificate of self-insurance from the department which may, in 1077 its discretion and upon application of such a person, issue said 1078 certificate of self-insurance when such person has satisfied the 1079 requirements of this section to qualify as a self-insurer under 1080 this section: 1081 (c)âThe owner of a qualified commercial motor vehicle, as 1082 defined in s. 207.002 or a commercial motor vehicle as defined 1083 in s. 320.01, may qualify as a self-insurer subject to the 1084 standards provided for in subparagraph (b)2. 1085 Section 33.âSubsection (11) of section 403.061, Florida 1086 Statutes, is amended to read: 1087 403.061âDepartment; powers and duties.âThe department shall 1088 have the power and the duty to control and prohibit pollution of 1089 air and water in accordance with the law and rules adopted and 1090 promulgated by it and, for this purpose, to: 1091 (11)âEstablish ambient air quality and water quality 1092 standards for the state as a whole or for any part thereof, and 1093 also standards for the abatement of excessive and unnecessary 1094 noise. The department is authorized to establish reasonable 1095 zones of mixing for discharges into waters. For existing 1096 installations as defined by rule 62-520.200(10), Florida 1097 Administrative Code, effective July 12, 2009, zones of discharge 1098 to groundwater are authorized horizontally to a facilityâs or 1099 ownerâs property boundary and extending vertically to the base 1100 of a specifically designated aquifer or aquifers. Such zones of 1101 discharge may be modified in accordance with procedures 1102 specified in department rules. Exceedance of primary and 1103 secondary groundwater standards that occur within a zone of 1104 discharge does not create liability pursuant to this chapter or 1105 chapter 376 for site cleanup, and the exceedance of soil cleanup 1106 target levels is not a basis for enforcement or site cleanup. 1107 (a)âWhen a receiving body of water fails to meet a water 1108 quality standard for pollutants set forth in department rules, a 1109 steam electric generating plant discharge of pollutants that is 1110 existing or licensed under this chapter on July 1, 1984, may 1111 nevertheless be granted a mixing zone, provided that: 1112 1.âThe standard would not be met in the water body in the 1113 absence of the discharge; 1114 2.âThe discharge is in compliance with all applicable 1115 technology-based effluent limitations; 1116 3.âThe discharge does not cause a measurable increase in 1117 the degree of noncompliance with the standard at the boundary of 1118 the mixing zone; and 1119 4.âThe discharge otherwise complies with the mixing zone 1120 provisions specified in department rules. 1121 (b)âMixing zones for point source discharges are not 1122 permitted in Outstanding Florida Waters except for: 1123 1.âSources that have received permits from the department 1124 prior to April 1, 1982, or the date of designation, whichever is 1125 later; 1126 2.âBlowdown from new power plants certified pursuant to the 1127 Florida Electrical Power Plant Siting Act; 1128 3.âDischarges of water necessary for water management 1129 purposes which have been approved by the governing board of a 1130 water management district and, if required by law, by the 1131 secretary; and 1132 4.âThe discharge of demineralization concentrate which has 1133 been determined permittable under s. 403.0882 and which meets 1134 the specific provisions of s. 403.0882(4)(a) and (b), if the 1135 proposed discharge is clearly in the public interest. 1136 (c)âThe department, by rule, shall establish water quality 1137 criteria for wetlands which criteria give appropriate 1138 recognition to the water quality of such wetlands in their 1139 natural state. 1140 1141 This act may not be construed to invalidate any existing 1142 department rule relating to mixing zones. The department shall 1143 cooperate with the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 1144 Vehicles in the development of regulations required by s. 1145 316.272(1). 1146 1147 The department shall implement such programs in conjunction with 1148 its other powers and duties and shall place special emphasis on 1149 reducing and eliminating contamination that presents a threat to 1150 humans, animals or plants, or to the environment. 1151 Section 34.âSubsection (9) of section 403.415, Florida 1152 Statutes, is amended to read: 1153 403.415âMotor vehicle noise.â 1154 (9)âOPERATING VEHICLE NOISE MEASUREMENTS.âThe department 1155 shall establish, with the cooperation of the Department of 1156 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, measurement procedures for 1157 determining compliance of operating vehicles with the noise 1158 limits of s. 316.293(2). The department shall advise the 1159 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles on technical 1160 aspects of motor vehicle noise enforcement regulations, assist 1161 in the training of enforcement officers, and administer a sound 1162 level meter loan program for local enforcement agencies. 1163 Section 35.âSection 627.7415, Florida Statutes, is amended 1164 to read: 1165 627.7415âCommercial or qualified motor vehicles; additional 1166 liability insurance coverage.âCommercial motor vehicles, as 1167 defined in s. 207.002 or s. 320.01 and qualified motor vehicles 1168 as defined in s. 207.002, operated upon the roads and highways 1169 of this state must shall be insured with the following minimum 1170 levels of combined bodily liability insurance and property 1171 damage liability insurance in addition to any other insurance 1172 requirements: 1173 (1)âFifty thousand dollars per occurrence for a commercial 1174 motor vehicle or qualified motor vehicle with a gross vehicle 1175 weight of 26,000 pounds or more, but less than 35,000 pounds. 1176 (2)âOne hundred thousand dollars per occurrence for a 1177 commercial motor vehicle or qualified motor vehicle with a gross 1178 vehicle weight of 35,000 pounds or more, but less than 44,000 1179 pounds. 1180 (3)âThree hundred thousand dollars per occurrence for a 1181 commercial motor vehicle or qualified motor vehicle with a gross 1182 vehicle weight of 44,000 pounds or more. 1183 (4)âAll commercial motor vehicles and qualified motor 1184 vehicles subject to regulations of the United States Department 1185 of Transportation, 49 C.F.R. part 387, subparts A and B, and as 1186 may be hereinafter amended, must shall be insured in an amount 1187 equivalent to the minimum levels of financial responsibility as 1188 set forth in such regulations. 1189 1190 A violation of this section is a noncriminal traffic infraction, 1191 punishable as a nonmoving violation as provided in chapter 318. 1192 Section 36.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.